Utah statutes.
26-7-1.   Identification of major risk factors by department -- Education of
public -- Establishment of programs.
The department shall identify the major risk factors contributing to injury,
sickness, death, and disability within the state and where it determines that
a need exists, educate the public regarding these risk factors, and the
department may establish programs to reduce or eliminate these factors except
that such programs shall not be established if adequate programs exist in the
private sector.
